Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. PARKS AND OTHER RECREATIONAL AND CULTURAL RESOURCES

SUBTITLE B. COUNTY PARKS AND OTHER RECREATIONAL AND CULTURAL RESOURCES

CHAPTER 319. HORTICULTURAL AND AGRICULTURAL EXHIBITS IN COUNTIES

Sec. 319.001. ANNUAL EXHIBITS. The commissioners court of a county may provide for annual exhibits of horticultural, agricultural, livestock, mineral, and other products that are of interest to the community.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 319.002. MUSEUMS, BUILDINGS, AND IMPROVEMENTS. To aid in the exhibition of products listed in Section 319.001, the commissioners court of a county may establish and maintain a museum, building, or other improvement in the county or at any other location in the United States at which a fair or exposition is being held.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 319.003. COOPERATIVE EFFORTS. (a) Two or more counties may cooperate with one another and a county may cooperate with local interests to construct the museum, building, or other improvement or to aid and share expenses in the exhibition of products listed in Section 319.001.

(b) A municipality, water improvement district, or water control and improvement district may cooperate with the commissioners court of a county for a purpose stated by Subsection (a) and may appropriate money to aid in the purpose.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 319.004. CONTRACTS AND LEASES. (a) The commissioners court of a county may contract for the complete management of, and for the conducting, maintenance, use, and operation of, buildings, improvements, and exhibits authorized by this chapter or by Subchapter B, Chapter 1473, Government Code.

(b) The commissioners court may lease the buildings, improvements, or exhibits.

(c) A contract or lease made under this section must be evidenced by an order of the commissioners court and entered in the minutes of the court.

(d) The commissioners court may permit the use of a building, improvement, or exhibit for any public purpose the court determines to be of benefit to the county and its residents.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 68, eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 8.315, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 319.005. REVENUE. The commissioners court of a county may use the net revenue derived from the use of a building, improvement, or exhibit authorized by this chapter or by Subchapter B, Chapter 1473, Government Code, for the management, operation, maintenance, development, improvement, or promotion of activities authorized under this chapter or under Subchapter B, Chapter 1473, Government Code, or for any other public purpose.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 68, eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 8.316, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.